Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-147
Materiel administrator; appointment.

The materiel administrator shall be appointed by the Director of Administrative Services.

Laws 1943, c. 215, § 3, p. 705;

R.S.1943, § 81-147;

Laws 1959, c. 427, § 1, p. 1430;

Laws 1969, c. 780, § 1, p. 2954.